Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
461J

PHYSICAL
THERAPY PRACTICE ACT

Section

461J-1 Definitions

461J-2 Practice of physical therapy;
qualifications

461J-2.3 Physical therapist use of support or
auxiliary

personnel

461J-2.5 Prohibited practices

461J-3 Exemptions

461J-4 Board of physical therapy; establishment,
appointment,

membership

461J-5 Powers and duties of board

461J-6 Permanent licenses

461J-7 Examination waiver

461J-7.5 Physical therapist assistant license
without necessity

of examination

461J-8 License without necessity of examination
or meeting

the education requirement

461J-9 Temporary license

461J-10 Biennial renewal; failure to renew

461J-10.1 Continuing competence

461J-10.11 Content standards of continuing
competence

461J-10.12 Continuing competence subject matter
requirements and

other limitations

461J-10.13 Authorized providers of continuing
competence units

461J-10.14 Exemption from continuing competence
requirements

461J-10.15 Recordkeeping for continuing competence

461J-11 Repealed

461J-12 Revocation, suspension, probation of
license

461J-12.5 Inactive status

461J-13 Penalty

Note

Physical therapist assistant surcharge. L 2013, c 220, §7.

Rules adoption no later than December 1, 2014; physical
therapist assistants may practice without a license until November 30, 2014, or
effective date of rules implementing license requirements, whichever occurs
first. L 2013, c 220, §10.

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next